Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-9,115
Class V School Employees Retirement Fund; created; use; expenses; payment.

(1) The Class V School Employees Retirement Fund is created.

(2)(a) The required deposits of the school district and the state contributions transferred to the school district by the State Treasurer for transmission to the retirement system and required deposits of the employees shall be credited to the Class V School Employees Retirement Fund and all allowances, annuities, and other benefits shall be paid from such fund as directed by the retirement board as provided in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

(b) The account of each member in the Class V School Employees Retirement Fund shall be credited with regular interest earned monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually as the retirement board may direct.

(3) Any expenses with respect to the transfer to and assumption by the council and the state investment officer of the duty and authority to invest the assets of a retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act shall be charged to the Class V School Employees Retirement Fund. Such expenses shall be paid without the approval of the board of trustees or the retirement board, as applicable.

Laws 1951, c. 274, § 27, p. 925;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1058;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 650;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 27;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 70;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 43;

Laws 2017, LB29, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 36;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 34.
July 18, 2026